Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2609
Award.

(a) The award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrators joining in the award. The arbitrators shall deliver a copy to each party personally or by registered or certified mail or as provided in the agreement.

(b) An award shall be made within the time fixed therefor by the agreement or, if not so fixed, within such time as the court orders on application of a party but not more than thirty days after the hearing. The parties may extend the time in writing either before or after the expiration thereof. A party waives the objection that an award was not made within the time required unless he or she notifies the arbitrators of his or her objection prior to the delivery of the award to him or her.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 9.

Pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, an arbitration award signed by only one of three arbitrators required to sign the award was defective in form but not in substance, and thus the parties were permitted to make timely application to modify or correct the award under subsection (a)(3) of section 25-2614. Hartman v. City of Grand Island, 265 Neb. 433, 657 N.W.2d 641 (2003).

The appellant waived an objection under this section where there was nothing in the record to support a conclusion that he notified the
arbitrators of his objection prior to the delivery of the award. Damrow v.
Murdoch, 15 Neb. App. 920, 739 N.W.2d 229 (2007).